Illinois, session 104th, SB3739.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Community-Integrated Living Arrangements 5Licensure and Certification Act is amended by changing Section 64 as follows: 7    (210 ILCS 135/4)  (from Ch. 91 1/2, par. 1704)8    Sec. 4. (a) Any community developmental services agency 9who wishes to develop and support a variety of 10community-integrated living arrangements may do so pursuant to 11a license issued by the Department under this Act. However, 12programs established under or otherwise subject to the Child 13Care Act of 1969, the Nursing Home Care Act, the Specialized 14Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013, the ID/DD Community 15Care Act, or the MC/DD Act, as now or hereafter amended, shall 16remain subject thereto, and this Act shall not be construed to 17limit the application of those Acts.18    (b) The system of licensure established under this Act 19shall be for the purposes of:20        (1) ensuring that all recipients residing in 21    community-integrated living arrangements are receiving 22    appropriate community-based services, including 23    treatment, training and habilitation or rehabilitation;  SB3739- 2 -LRB104 19416 BAB 32864 b1        (2) ensuring that recipients' rights are protected and 2    that all programs provided to and placements arranged for 3    recipients comply with this Act, the Mental Health and 4    Developmental Disabilities Code, and applicable Department 5    rules and regulations;6        (3) maintaining the integrity of communities by 7    requiring regular monitoring and inspection of placements 8    and other services provided in community-integrated living 9    arrangements. 10    The licensure system shall be administered by a quality 11assurance unit within the Department which shall be 12administratively independent of units responsible for funding 13of agencies or community services.14    (c) As a condition of being licensed by the Department as a 15community developmental services agency under this Act, the 16agency shall certify to the Department that: 17        (1) all recipients residing in community-integrated 18    living arrangements are receiving appropriate 19    community-based services, including treatment, training 20    and habilitation or rehabilitation; 21        (2) all programs provided to and placements arranged 22    for recipients are supervised by the agency; and23        (3) all programs provided to and placements arranged 24    for recipients comply with this Act, the Mental Health and 25    Developmental Disabilities Code, and applicable Department 26    rules and regulations.  SB3739- 3 -LRB104 19416 BAB 32864 b1    (c-5) Each developmental services agency licensed under 2this Act shall submit an annual report to the Department, as a 3contractual requirement between the Department and the 4developmental services agency, certifying that all 5legislatively or administratively mandated wage increases to 6benefit workers are passed through in accordance with the 7legislative or administrative mandate. The Department shall 8determine the manner and form of the annual report. 9    (d) An applicant for licensure as a community 10developmental services agency under this Act shall submit an 11application pursuant to the application process established by 12the Department by rule and shall pay an application fee in an 13amount established by the Department, which amount shall not 14be more than $200.15    (e) If an applicant meets the requirements established by 16the Department to be licensed as a community developmental 17services agency under this Act, after payment of the licensing 18fee, the Department shall issue a license valid for 2 3 years 19from the date thereof unless suspended or revoked by the 20Department or voluntarily surrendered by the agency.21    (f) Upon application to the Department, the Department may 22issue a temporary permit to an applicant for up to a 2-year 23period to allow the holder of such permit reasonable time to 24become eligible for a license under this Act.25    (g)(1) The Department may conduct site visits to an agency 26licensed under this Act, or to any program or placement   SB3739- 4 -LRB104 19416 BAB 32864 b1certified by the agency, and inspect the records or premises, 2or both, of such agency, program or placement as it deems 3appropriate, for the purpose of determining compliance with 4this Act, the Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities 5Code, and applicable Department rules and regulations. The 6Department shall conduct inspections of the records and 7premises of each community-integrated living arrangement 8certified under this Act at least once every 2 years.9    (2) If the Department determines that an agency licensed 10under this Act is not in compliance with this Act or the rules 11and regulations promulgated under this Act, the Department 12shall serve a notice of violation upon the licensee. Each 13notice of violation shall be prepared in writing and shall 14specify the nature of the violation, the statutory provision 15or rule alleged to have been violated, and that the licensee 16submit a plan of correction to the Department if required. The 17notice shall also inform the licensee of any other action 18which the Department might take pursuant to this Act and of the 19right to a hearing.20    (g-5) As determined by the Department, a disproportionate 21number or percentage of licensure complaints; a 22disproportionate number or percentage of substantiated cases 23of abuse, neglect, or exploitation involving an agency; an 24apparent unnatural death of an individual served by an agency; 25any egregious or life-threatening abuse or neglect within an 26agency; or any other significant event as determined by the   SB3739- 5 -LRB104 19416 BAB 32864 b1Department shall initiate a review of the agency's license by 2the Department, as well as a review of its service agreement 3for funding. The Department shall adopt rules to establish the 4process by which the determination to initiate a review shall 5be made and the timeframe to initiate a review upon the making 6of such determination. 7    (h) Upon the expiration of any license issued under this 8Act, a license renewal application shall be required of and a 9license renewal fee in an amount established by the Department 10shall be charged to a community developmental services agency, 11provided that such fee shall not be more than $200.12    (i) A public or private agency, association, partnership, 13corporation, or organization that has had a license revoked 14under subsection (b) of Section 6 of this Act may not apply for 15or possess a license under a different name. 16(Source: P.A. 104-270, eff. 8-15-25.)